test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kieles_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - kieles: # 2B
    kie´les+N+Sg+Nom: kieles
    kie´les+N+Sg+Gen: kiällás
    kie´les+N+Sg+Acc: kiällás
    kie´les+N+Sg+Ill: kiälásân
    kie´les+N+Sg+Loc: kiälásist
    kie´les+N+Sg+Com: kiälásáin
    kie´les+N+Sg+Abe: kiällásttáá
    kie´les+N+Ess:    kielesin              #kiälásin
    kie´les+N+Par:    kielesid              #kiälásid
    kie´les+N+Pl+Nom: kiäláseh
    kie´les+N+Pl+Gen: kiälásij
    kie´les+N+Pl+Acc: kiälásijd
    kie´les+N+Pl+Ill: kiälásáid
    kie´les+N+Pl+Loc: kiälásijn
    kie´les+N+Pl+Com: kiälásijguin
    kie´les+N+Pl+Abe: kiälásijttáá
